Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2806.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 16-166, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-166. Verification of registration; quarterly report A. Except for the mailing of sample ballots, a county recorder who mails an item to any elector shall send the mailing by nonforwardable first class mail marked with the statement required by the postmaster to receive an address correction notification. If the item is returned undelivered, the county recorder shall send a follow-up notice to that elector within three weeks of receipt of the returned notice. The county recorder shall send the follow-up notice to the address that appears in the general county register or to the forwarding address provided by the United States postal service. The follow-up notice shall include an appropriate internet address for revising voter registration information or a registration form and the information prescribed by section 16-131, subsection C and shall state that if the elector does not complete and return a new registration form with current information to the county recorder or make changes to the elector's voter registration information that is maintained online within thirty-five days, the elector's registration status shall be changed from active to inactive. B. If the elector provides the county recorder with a new registration form or otherwise revises the elector's information, the county recorder shall change the general register to reflect the changes indicated on the new registration. If the elector indicates a new residence address outside that county, the county recorder shall forward the voter registration form or revised information to the county recorder of the county in which the elector's address is located.  If the elector provides a new residence address that is located outside this state, the county recorder shall cancel the elector's registration. C. The county recorder shall maintain on the inactive voter list the names of electors who have been removed from the general register pursuant to subsection A or E of this section for a period of four years or through the date of the second general election for federal office following the date of the notice from the county recorder that is sent pursuant to subsection E of this section. D. On notice that a government agency has changed the name of any street, route number, post office box number or other address designation, the county recorder shall revise the registration records and shall send a new verification of registration notice to the electors whose records were changed. E. The county recorder on or before May 1 of each year preceding a state primary and general election or more frequently as the recorder deems necessary may use the change of address information supplied by the postal service through its licensees and the information provided by an electronic voter registration information center to identify registrants whose addresses may have changed. If it appears from information provided by the postal service or an electronic voter registration information center that a registrant has moved to a different residence address, the county recorder shall send the registrant a notice of the change by forwardable mail and a postage prepaid preaddressed return form or an appropriate internet address for revising voter registration information by which the registrant may verify or correct the registration information. If the registrant fails to revise the information or return the form postmarked not later than thirty-five days after the mailing of the notice, the elector's registration status shall be changed from active to inactive. If the notice sent by the recorder is not returned, the registrant may be required to provide affirmation or confirmation of the registrant's address in order to vote.  If the registrant does not vote in an election during the period after the date of the notice from the recorder through the date of the second general election for federal office following the date of that notice, the registrant's name shall be removed from the list of inactive voters. If the registrant has changed residence to a new county, the county recorder shall provide information on how the registrant can continue to be eligible to vote. F. The county recorder shall reject any application for registration that is not accompanied by satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship.  Satisfactory evidence of citizenship shall include any of the following: 1. The number of the applicant's driver license or nonoperating identification license issued after October 1, 1996 by the department of transportation or the equivalent governmental agency of another state within the United States if the agency indicates on the applicant's driver license or nonoperating identification license that the person has provided satisfactory proof of United States citizenship. 2. A legible photocopy of the applicant's birth certificate that verifies citizenship to the satisfaction of the county recorder. 3. A legible photocopy of pertinent pages of the applicant's United States passport identifying the applicant and the applicant's passport number or presentation to the county recorder of the applicant's United States passport. 4. A presentation to the county recorder of the applicant's United States naturalization documents or the number of the certificate of naturalization.  If only the number of the certificate of naturalization is provided, the applicant shall not be included in the registration rolls until the number of the certificate of naturalization is verified with the United States immigration and naturalization service by the county recorder. 5. Other documents or methods of proof that are established pursuant to the immigration reform and control act of 1986. 6. The applicant's bureau of Indian affairs card number, tribal treaty card number or tribal enrollment number. G. Notwithstanding subsection F of this section, any person who is registered in this state on the effective date of this amendment to this section is deemed to have provided satisfactory evidence of citizenship and shall not be required to resubmit evidence of citizenship unless the person is changing voter registration from one county to another. H. For the purposes of this section, proof of voter registration from another state or county is not satisfactory evidence of citizenship. I. A person who modifies voter registration records with a new residence ballot shall not be required to submit evidence of citizenship.  After citizenship has been demonstrated to the county recorder, the person is not required to resubmit satisfactory evidence of citizenship in that county. J. After a person has submitted satisfactory evidence of citizenship, the county recorder shall indicate this information in the person's permanent voter file. After two years the county recorder may destroy all documents that were submitted as evidence of citizenship. K. The county recorder may not register a person to vote in this state who is not verified as having United States citizenship unless verified by using the United States department of homeland security's systematic alien verification for entitlements program, or its successor program. The county recorder shall submit satisfactory evidence of a fully executed memorandum of understanding with the United States department of homeland security to use the systematic alien verification for entitlements program, or its successor program, to the joint legislative budget committee. The joint legislative budget committee shall report to the legislature if satisfactory proof required by this subsection is not provided. On or before December 31, 2026 and on or before March 31, June 30, September 30 and December 31 of each year thereafter, the county recorder shall submit to the auditor general a report on the previous three months that includes all systematic alien verification for entitlements program queries, approvals, denials and discrepancies. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 28-3153, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3153. Driver license issuance; prohibitions; quarterly report A. The department shall not issue the following: 1. A driver license to a person who is under eighteen years of age, except that the department may issue: (a) A restricted instruction permit for a class D or G license to a person who is at least fifteen years of age. (b) An instruction permit for a class D, G or M license as provided by this chapter to a person who is at least fifteen years and six months of age. (c) A class G or M license as provided by this chapter to a person who is at least sixteen years of age. 2. A class D, G or M license or instruction permit to a person who is under eighteen years of age and who has been tried in adult court and convicted of a second or subsequent violation of criminal damage to property pursuant to section 13-1602, subsection A, paragraph 1 or convicted of a felony offense in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used, including theft of a motor vehicle pursuant to section 13-1802, unlawful use of means of transportation pursuant to section 13-1803 or theft of means of transportation pursuant to section 13-1814, or who has been adjudicated delinquent for a second or subsequent act that would constitute criminal damage to property pursuant to section 13-1602, subsection A, paragraph 1 or adjudicated delinquent for an act that would constitute a felony offense in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used, including theft of a motor vehicle pursuant to section 13-1802, unlawful use of means of transportation pursuant to section 13-1803 or theft of means of transportation pursuant to section 13-1814, if committed by an adult. 3. A class A, B or C license to a person who is under twenty-one years of age, except that the department may issue a class A, B or C license that is restricted to only intrastate driving to a person who is at least eighteen years of age. 4. A license to a person whose license or driving privilege has been suspended, during the suspension period. 5. Except as provided in section 28-3315, a license to a person whose license or driving privilege has been revoked. 6. A class A, B or C license to a person who has been disqualified from obtaining a commercial driver license. 7. A license to a person who on application notifies the department that the person is an alcoholic as defined in section 36-2021 or a drug dependent person as defined in section 36-2501, unless the person submits a medical examination report that includes a current evaluation from an addiction counselor indicating that, in the opinion of the counselor, the condition does not affect or impair the person's ability to safely operate a motor vehicle. 8. A license to a person who has been adjudged to be incapacitated pursuant to section 14-5304 and who at the time of application has not obtained either a court order that allows the person to drive or a termination of incapacity as provided by law. 9. A license to a person who is required by this chapter to take an examination unless the person successfully passes the examination. 10. A license to a person who is required under the motor vehicle financial responsibility laws of this state to deposit proof of financial responsibility and who has not deposited the proof. 11. A license to a person if the department has good cause to believe that the operation of a motor vehicle on the highways by the person would threaten the public safety or welfare. 12. A license to a person whose driver license has been ordered to be suspended for failure to pay child support, except that a noncommercial restricted license may be issued pursuant to section 25-518. 13. A class A, B or C license to a person whose license or driving privilege has been canceled until the cause for the cancellation has been removed. 14. A class A, B or C license or instruction permit to a person whose state of domicile is not this state. 15. A class A, B or C license to a person who fails to demonstrate proficiency in the English language as determined by the department. B. The department shall not issue a driver license to or renew the driver license of the following persons: 1. A person about whom the court notifies the department that the person violated the person's written promise to appear in court when charged with a violation of the motor vehicle laws of this state until the department receives notification in a manner approved by the department that the person appeared either voluntarily or involuntarily or that the case has been adjudicated, that the case is being appealed or that the case has otherwise been disposed of as provided by law. 2. If notified pursuant to section 28-1601, a person who fails to pay a civil penalty as provided in section 28-1601, except for a parking violation, until the department receives notification in a manner approved by the department that the person paid the civil penalty, that the case is being appealed or that the case has otherwise been disposed of as provided by law. C. The magistrate or the clerk of the court shall provide the notification to the department prescribed by subsection B of this section. D. Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall not issue to or renew a driver license or nonoperating identification license for a person who does not submit proof satisfactory to the department that the applicant's presence in the United States is authorized under federal law.  The department shall submit satisfactory evidence of a fully executed memorandum of understanding with the United States department of homeland security to use the systematic alien verification for entitlements program, or its successor program, to the joint legislative budget committee. The joint legislative budget committee shall recommend to the legislature the reduction in funding for the department if satisfactory proof required by this subsection is not provided.  On or before December 31, 2026 and on or before March 31, June 30, September 30 and December 31 of each year thereafter, the department shall submit to the auditor general a report on the previous three months that includes all systematic alien verification for entitlements program queries, approvals, denials and discrepancies. For an application for a driver license or a nonoperating identification license, the department shall not accept as a primary source of identification a driver license issued by a state if the state does not require that a driver licensed in that state be lawfully present in the United States under federal law. The director shall adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this subsection. The rules shall include procedures for: 1. Verification that the applicant's presence in the United States is authorized under federal law using the United States department of homeland security's systematic alien verification for entitlements program or its successor program. 2. Issuance of a temporary driver permit pursuant to section 28-3157 pending verification of the applicant's status in the United States. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 36-2903.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-2903.03. United States citizenship and qualified alien requirements for eligibility; quarterly report; definition A. A person who is applying for eligibility under this chapter shall provide verification of United States citizenship or documented verification of qualified alien status. Beginning July 1, 2006, an applicant who is applying for services pursuant to this chapter shall provide satisfactory documentary evidence of citizenship or qualified alien status as required by the federal deficit reduction act of 2005 (P.L. 109-171; 120 Stat. 4; 42 United States Code section 1396b) or any other applicable federal law or regulation. The administration shall submit satisfactory evidence of a fully executed memorandum of understanding with the United States department of homeland security to use the systematic alien verification for entitlements program, or its successor program, to the joint legislative budget committee.  The joint legislative budget committee shall recommend to the legislature the reduction in funding for the ADMINISTRATION if satisfactory proof required by this subsection is not provided. B. A qualified alien may apply for eligibility pursuant to section 36-2901, paragraph 6, subdivision (a) and, if otherwise eligible for title XIX, may receive all services pursuant to section 36-2907 if the qualified alien meets at least one of the following requirements: 1. Is designated as one of the exception groups under 8 United States Code section 1613(b). 2. Has been a qualified alien for at least five years. 3. Has been continuously present in the United States since August 21, 1996. C. Notwithstanding any other law, persons who were residing in the United States under color of law on or before August 21, 1996, and who were receiving services under this article based on eligibility criteria established under the supplemental security income program, may apply for state funded services and, if otherwise eligible for supplemental security income-medical assistance only coverage except for United States citizenship or qualified alien requirements, may be enrolled with the system and receive all services pursuant to section 36-2907. D. A person who is a qualified alien who does not meet the requirements of subsection B of this section or who is a noncitizen who does not claim and provide verification of qualified alien status may apply for title XIX eligibility under section 36-2901, paragraph 6, subdivision (a) and, if otherwise eligible for title XIX, may receive only emergency services pursuant to section 1903(v) of the social security act. E. In determining the eligibility for all qualified aliens pursuant to this chapter, the income and resources of any person who executed an affidavit of support pursuant to section 213A of the immigration and nationality act on behalf of the qualified alien and the income and resources of the spouse, if any, of the sponsoring individual shall be counted at the time of application and for the redetermination of eligibility for the duration of the attribution period as specified in federal law. F. A person who is a qualified alien or a noncitizen and who is not eligible for title XIX may receive only emergency services. G. On or before September 30 of each year December 31, 2026 and on or before March 31, June 30, September 30 and December 31 of each year thereafter, the administration shall submit a report to the governor, the auditor general, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives and the staff director of the joint legislative budget committee that includes the following information for the previous three months: 1. The number of individuals for whom the administration verified queried, approved, denied or found DISCREPANCIES for immigration status using the systematic alien verification for entitlements program, or its successor program, administered by the United States citizenship and immigration services Department of HOMELAND security. 2. The number of documents that were discovered to be fraudulent by using the systematic alien verification for entitlements program, or its successor program. 3. A list of the types of fraudulent documents discovered. 4. The number of citizens of the United States who were referred by the administration for prosecution pursuant to violations of state or federal law and the number of individuals referred by the administration for prosecution who were not citizens. H. The administration shall provide copies of the report to the secretary of state and the director of the Arizona state library, archives and public records. I. For the purposes of this section, "qualified alien" means an individual who is one of the following: 1. Defined as a qualified alien under 8 United States Code section 1641. 2. Defined as a qualified alien by the attorney general of the United States under the authority of Public Law 104-208, section 501. 3. An Indian described in 8 United States Code section 1612(b)(2)(E). END_STATUTE